Utah statutes.
76-3-203.10.   Violent offense committed in presence of a child -- Penalties.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "In the presence of a child" means:

(i)  in the physical presence of a child younger than 14 years of age; and

(ii)  having knowledge that the child is present and may see or hear the commission of a violent criminal offense.

(b)  "Violent criminal offense" means any criminal offense involving violence or physical harm or threat of violence or physical harm, or any attempt to commit a criminal offense involving violence or physical harm that is not a domestic violence offense as defined in Section 77-36-1.

(2)  A person commits a violent criminal offense in the presence of a child if the person:

(a)  commits or attempts to commit criminal homicide, as defined in Section 76-5-201, against a third party in the presence of a child;

(b)  intentionally causes or attempts to cause serious bodily injury to a third party or uses a dangerous weapon, as defined in Section 76-1-601, or other means or force likely to produce death or serious bodily injury, against a third party in the presence of a child; or

(c)  under circumstances not amounting to a violation of Subsection (2)(a) or (b), commits a violent criminal offense in the presence of a child.

(3)  A person who violates Subsection (2) is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Enacted by Chapter 359, 2010 General Session

